Idaho statutes. Title 72 WORKER’S COMPENSATION AND RELATED LAWS — INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION
Chapter 13 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY LAW
§ 72-1360. Liens.

Upon the failure of any person to pay any amount when due under this chapter, including the failure to repay overpayments as that term is defined in section 72-1369, Idaho Code, the director may file with the office of the secretary of state, as provided in chapter 19, title 45, Idaho Code, a notice of lien.

Upon delivery to the secretary of state, the notice of lien shall be filed and maintained in accordance with chapter 19, title 45, Idaho Code. When such notice is duly filed, all amounts due shall constitute a lien upon the entire interest, legal or equitable, in any property of such person, real or personal, tangible or intangible, not exempt from execution, situated in the state. Such lien may be enforced by the director or by any sheriff of the various counties in the same manner as a judgment of the district court duly docketed and the amount secured by the lien shall bear interest at the rate of one and one-half (1 1/2) times the rate computed for judgments pursuant to section 28-22-104(2), Idaho Code, in effect on January 1 of the year in which the lien is filed, rounded up to the nearest one-eighth percent (1/8%). The foregoing remedy shall be in addition to all other remedies provided by law. The amount of interest collected pursuant to this section may be compromised at the discretion of the director when such compromise is in the best interest of the department.

In any suit or action involving the title to real or personal property against which the state has a perfected lien, the state shall be made a party to such suit or action.

§ 72-1360A. Collection of lien amounts.

In addition to all other remedies or actions provided by this chapter, it shall be lawful for the director or his agent to collect any amounts secured by liens created pursuant to this chapter by seizure and sale of the property of any person liable for such amounts who fails to pay the same within thirty (30) days from the mailing of notice and demand for payment thereof.

Property exempt from seizure shall be the same property as is exempt from execution under the provisions of chapter 6, title 11, Idaho Code.

In exercising his authority under subsection (1) of this section, the director may levy, or by his warrant, authorize any of his representatives, a sheriff or deputy to levy upon, seize and sell any nonexempt property belonging to any person liable for the amounts secured by the lien.

When a warrant is issued by the department for the collection of any amount due pursuant to a lien authorized by this chapter, it shall be directed to any authorized representative of the department, or to any sheriff or deputy, and any such warrant shall have the same force and effect as a writ of execution. It may be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same force and effect as a levy and sale pursuant to a writ of execution. Upon the completion of his services pursuant to said warrant, the sheriff or deputy shall receive the same fees and expenses as are provided by law for services related to a writ of execution. All such fees and expenses shall be an obligation of the person liable for the amounts due and shall be collected from such person by virtue of the warrant. Any warrant issued by the director shall contain, at a minimum, the name and address of the liable person; the nature of the underlying liability; the date the liability was incurred; the amount of the liability secured by the lien; the amount of any penalty, interest or other amount due under the lien; and the interest rate on the lien.

Whenever any property that is seized and sold by virtue of the foregoing provisions is not sufficient to satisfy the claim of the state for which seizure is made, any other property subject to seizure shall be seized and sold until the amount due from such person, together with all expenses, is fully paid.

All persons are required, on demand of a representative of the department, a sheriff or deputy acting pursuant to this chapter, to produce all documentary evidence and statements relating to the property or rights in the property subject to seizure.

§ 72-1361. Appeals to the department and to the commission.

Upon appeal from a denial of a claim for refund or credit, determination of amounts due upon failure to report, determination of rate of contribution, determination of coverage, determination of chargeability, jeopardy determination, cost reimbursement determination, determination of mandatory transfer of experience rating, or determination of successor liability, the director may transfer the appeal directly to an appeals examiner pursuant to section 72-1368(6), Idaho Code, or he may issue a redetermination affirming, reversing or modifying the initial determination. A redetermination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the department’s rules. Appeal procedures shall be governed by the provisions of section 72-1368(4), (6), (7), (8), (9) and (11), Idaho Code. The party appealing shall have the burden of proving each issue appealed by clear and convincing evidence. The provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, regarding contested cases and judicial review of contested cases are inapplicable to proceedings involving interested employers under this chapter.

§ 72-1362. Liability of successor.

Any person, whether or not a covered employer, who acquires the organization, trade, or business or a substantial part of the assets thereof, from a covered employer, shall be liable, in an amount not to exceed the reasonable value of the organization, trade, business, or assets acquired, for any contributions or penalties due or accrued and unpaid by such covered employer, and the amount of such liability shall, in addition, be a lien against the property or assets so acquired which shall be prior to all other liens; provided, that the lien shall not be valid against one who acquires from the said predecessor any interest in the said property or assets in good faith, for value and without notice of the lien. The director shall, upon written request therefor, and with permission of the owner, furnish such prospective purchaser with a written statement of the amount of contributions and penalties due or accrued and unpaid by the said covered employer as of the date of such acquisition, and the amount of the liability of the successor or the amount of the said lien shall in no event exceed the liability disclosed by such statement. The foregoing remedies shall be in addition to all other existing remedies against the covered employer or his successor. Administrative determinations issued pursuant to this section shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed with the department in accordance with the department’s rules. Appeal proceedings shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.

§ 72-1363. Contributions deductible from taxable income. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1364. Uncollectible accounts.

The director may enter into agreements of compromise with employers with respect to amounts due under this chapter when it is determined by the director that the employer is unable to make full payment.

Amounts due under this chapter, which are uncollected three (3) years after they become due, may be deemed uncollectible by the director if there is no likelihood of collection at a future date.

§ 72-1365. Payment of benefits.

Benefits shall be paid from the employment security fund to any unemployed individual who is eligible for benefits as provided by section 72-1366, Idaho Code.

Periodically, the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement [bureau of child support services], shall forward to the director a list containing the full name and social security number of persons from whom it is seeking child support. The director shall match the names and social security numbers on the list with its records of individuals eligible for benefits, and shall notify the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, of the address and amount of benefits due each individual.

Voluntary withholding. The director shall deduct and withhold from any benefits payable to an individual that owes child support obligations as defined under paragraph (g) of this subsection, the amount specified by the individual to the director to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if paragraph (b) of this subsection below is not applicable.

Involuntary withholding. The director shall withhold any benefits of any person within the limits established by section 11-207, Idaho Code, upon notification and order by the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, to collect any delinquent child support obligation which has been assigned on behalf of any individual to the department of health and welfare under sections 56-203A and 56-203B, Idaho Code, or a child support obligation which the department seeks to collect pursuant to chapter 12, title 7, Idaho Code. The set-off or withholding of any benefits of a claimant shall become final after the following conditions have been met:

The child support payment to be set-off or withheld is a child support obligation established by order as defined in section 7-1202, Idaho Code.

All liabilities owed by reason of the provisions of section 72-1369, Idaho Code, have been collected by the director.

Notice of the set-off or withholding has been mailed by registered or certified mail from the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement [bureau of child support services], to the claimant-obligor at the address listed on the claim.

In its decision, the department of health and welfare may order the withholding and set-off of any subsequent benefits which may be due the claimant-obligor until the debt for which set-off is sought and any additional debts which are incurred by the claimant’s failure to make additional periodic payments based upon the same court order are satisfied.

Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be paid by the director to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as benefits and paid by such individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.
(e) For purposes of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, the term “benefits” means any compensation payable under this chapter, including amounts payable by the director pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

Benefits shall be paid only to the extent that moneys are available for such payments in the employment security fund.

Benefits shall be paid not less frequently than biweekly.

Upon request, the department of health and welfare, bureau of child support enforcement, shall make the procedures established in this section for collecting child support available to county prosecuting attorneys. The provisions of this subsection apply only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the requesting prosecuting attorney for the administrative costs incurred by the bureau, which are attributable to the request.

An individual filing a new claim for benefits shall, at the time of filing such claim, be advised that:
(6)(a) An individual filing a new claim for benefits shall, at the time of filing such claim, be advised that:

Benefits are subject to federal and state tax and requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;

The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s benefits at the amount specified in the federal internal revenue code;

The individual shall be permitted to change a previously elected withholding status once during each benefit year.

Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits shall remain in the unemployment fund [employment security fund] until transferred to the taxing authority as a payment of income tax.

The director shall follow all procedures specified by the United States department of labor and the federal internal revenue service pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax.

Amounts shall not be deducted and withheld under this subsection until the following deductions are made and withheld in the following order:

First, amounts owed for overpayments of benefits deducted and withheld pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1369, Idaho Code;

Second, amounts owed for child support obligations deducted and withheld pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

Within fourteen (14) days after such notice has been mailed (not counting Saturday, Sunday, or state holidays as the 14th day), the claimant-obligor may file a protest in writing, requesting a hearing before the department of health and welfare to determine his liability to the obligee. The hearing, if requested, shall be held within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the initial notice to the claimant-obligor of the proposed set-off. No issues at that hearing may be considered which have been litigated previously. The department of health and welfare shall issue its findings and decision either at the hearing or within ten (10) days of the hearing by mail to the claimant-obligor.

(f) This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for the administrative costs incurred by the director under the provisions of this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

(g) The term “child support obligation” is defined for the purposes of these provisions as including only an obligation which is being enforced pursuant to a plan described in section 454 of the social security act which has been approved by the secretary of health and human services under part D of title IV of the social security act.

(h) The term “state or local child support enforcement agency” as used in these provisions means any agency of this state or a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in paragraph (g) of this subsection.

§ 72-1366. Personal eligibility conditions.

The personal eligibility conditions of a benefit claimant are that:

The claimant shall have made a claim for benefits and provided all necessary information pertinent to eligibility.

The claimant shall have registered for work and thereafter reported to a job service office or other agency in a manner prescribed by the director.

The claimant shall have met the minimum wage requirements in his base period as provided in section 72-1367, Idaho Code.

During the whole of any week with respect to which he claims benefits or credit to his waiting period, the claimant was:
(4)(a) During the whole of any week with respect to which he claims benefits or credit to his waiting period, the claimant was:

Able to work, available for suitable work, and seeking work; provided, however, that no claimant shall be considered ineligible for failure to comply with the provisions of this subsection if:

Such failure is due to the claimant’s illness or disability that occurs after he has filed a claim and during such illness or disability, the claimant does not refuse or miss suitable work that would have provided wages greater than one-half (1/2) of the claimant’s weekly benefit amount; or

Such failure is due to compelling personal circumstances, provided that such failure does not exceed a minor portion of the claimant’s workweek and during which time the claimant does not refuse or miss suitable work that would have provided wages greater than one-half (1/2) of the claimant’s weekly benefit amount; and

Living in a state, territory, or country that is included in the interstate benefit payment plan or that is a party to an agreement with the United States or the director with respect to unemployment insurance.

If a claimant who is enrolled in an approved job training course pursuant to subsection (8) of this section fails to attend or otherwise participate in the job training course during any week with respect to which he claims benefits or credit to his waiting period, the claimant shall be ineligible for that week if he was not able to work nor available for suitable work, to be determined as follows: The claimant shall be ineligible unless he is making satisfactory progress in the training and his failure to attend or otherwise participate was due to:

The claimant’s illness or disability that occurred after he had filed a claim and the claimant missed fewer than one-half (1/2) of the classes available to him that week; or

Compelling personal circumstances, provided that the claimant missed fewer than one-half (1/2) of the classes available to him that week.

The job training can be completed within two (2) years, except that this requirement may be waived pursuant to rules that the director may prescribe.

A claimant shall not be denied regular unemployment benefits under any provision of this chapter relating to availability for work, active search for work or refusal to accept work, solely because the claimant is seeking only part-time work, if the department determines that a majority of the weeks of work in the claimant’s base period were for less than full-time work. For the purpose of this subsection [paragraph], “seeking only part-time work” is defined as seeking work that has comparable hours to the claimant’s part-time work experience in the base period, except that a claimant must be available for at least twenty (20) hours of work per week.

The claimant’s unemployment is not due to the fact that he left his employment voluntarily without good cause connected with his employment, or that he was discharged for misconduct in connection with his employment.

The claimant’s unemployment is not due to his failure without good cause to apply for available suitable work or to accept suitable work when offered to him. The longer a claimant has been unemployed, the more willing he must be to seek other types of work and accept work at a lower rate of pay.

In determining whether or not work is suitable for an individual, the degree of risk involved to his health, safety, morals, physical fitness, experience, training, past earnings, length of unemployment and prospects for obtaining local employment in his customary occupation, the distance of the work from his residence, and other pertinent factors shall be considered. No employment shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be denied to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work or to hold himself available for work under any of the following conditions:

If the vacancy of the position offered is due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute;

If the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are below those prevailing for similar work in the locality of the work offered;

If, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization.

No claimant who is otherwise eligible shall be denied benefits for any week due to an inability to comply with the requirements contained in subsections (4)(a)(i) and (6) of this section if:

The claimant is a participant in a program sponsored by title I of the workforce innovation and opportunity act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., as amended) and attends a job training course under that program; or

The claimant attends a job training course authorized pursuant to the provisions of section 236(a)(1) of the trade act of 1974 or the North American free trade agreement implementation act.

The claimant lacks skills to compete in the labor market and attends a job training course with the approval of the director. The director may approve job training courses that meet the following criteria:

The purpose of the job training is to teach the claimant skills that will enhance the claimant’s opportunities for employment; and

No claimant who is otherwise eligible shall be denied benefits under subsection (5) of this section for leaving employment to attend job training pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, provided that the claimant obtained the employment after enrollment in or during scheduled breaks in the job training course, or that the employment was not suitable. For purposes of this subsection, the term “suitable employment” means work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual’s past employment, and wages for such work are not less than eighty percent (80%) of the average weekly wage in the individual’s past employment.
(10) A claimant shall not be eligible to receive benefits for any week with respect to which it is found that his unemployment is due to a labor dispute; provided, that this subsection shall not apply if it is shown that:

The claimant is not participating, financing, aiding, abetting, or directly interested in the labor dispute; and

The claimant does not belong to a grade or class of workers with members employed at the premises at which the labor dispute occurs, who are participating in or directly interested in the dispute.

As used in this section, “contract period” means the entire period for which the individual contracts to perform services, pursuant to the terms of the contract.

With respect to any services described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services in any capacities specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection to any individual who performed such services in an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “educational service agency” means a governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing such services to one (1) or more educational institutions.

Who has been assigned to work for one (1) or more customers of a staffing service; and

Who, at the time of hire by the staffing service, signed a written notice informing him that completion or termination of an assignment for a customer would not, of itself, terminate the employment relationship with the staffing service;

Contacts the staffing service and refuses a suitable work assignment that is offered to him at that time, he will be considered to have voluntarily quit that employment; or

Contacts the staffing service and the service does not have a suitable work assignment for him, he will be considered unemployed due to a lack of work; or

Accepts new employment without first contacting the staffing service for additional work, he will be considered to have voluntarily quit employment with the staffing service.

The claimant is unemployed;

The claimant has exhausted all rights to regular unemployment benefits as defined in section 72-1367A(1)(e), Idaho Code, and all rights to extended benefits as defined in section 72-1367A(1)(f), Idaho Code, and all rights to benefits under section 2002 (“increase in unemployment compensation benefits”) of division B, title II, the assistance for unemployed workers and struggling families act, of the American recovery and reinvestment act of 2009, public law 111-5, as enacted on February 17, 2009;

The claimant is enrolled in a training program approved by the department or in a job training program authorized under the workforce innovation and opportunity act; except that the training program must prepare the claimant for entry into a high-demand occupation if the department determines that the claimant separated from a declining occupation or has been involuntarily and indefinitely separated from employment as a result of a permanent reduction of operations at the claimant’s place of employment. For the purposes of this subsection, a “declining occupation” is one where there is a lack of sufficient current demand in the claimant’s labor market area for the occupational skills for which the claimant is qualified by training and experience or current physical or mental capacity and the lack of employment opportunities is expected to continue for an extended period of time, or the claimant’s occupation is one for which there is a seasonal variation in demand in the labor market and the claimant has no other skills for which there is current demand. For the purposes of this subsection, a “high-demand occupation” is an occupation in a labor market area where work opportunities are available and qualified applicants are lacking as determined by the use of available labor market information;
(iv) The claimant is making satisfactory progress to complete the training as determined by the department; and

The claimant is not receiving similar stipends or other training allowances for nontraining costs. For the purposes of this subsection, “similar stipend” means an amount provided under a program with similar aims, such as providing training to increase employability, and in approximately the same amounts.

This subsection shall apply only if the claimant submits with each claim report a written certification from the training facility that the claimant is attending and satisfactorily completing the job training course. If the claimant fails to attend or otherwise participate in the job training course, it must be determined whether the claimant is able to work and available for suitable work as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(11) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits for any week with respect to which or a part of which he has received or is seeking benefits under an unemployment insurance law of another state or of the United States; provided, that if the appropriate agency of such other state or of the United States shall finally determine that he is not entitled to such unemployment compensation or insurance benefits, he shall not by the provisions of this subsection be denied benefits. For purposes of this section, a law of the United States providing any payments of any type and in any amounts for periods of unemployment due to involuntary unemployment shall be considered an unemployment insurance law of the United States.

(12) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits for a period of fifty-two (52) weeks if it is determined that he has willfully made a false statement or willfully failed to report a material fact in order to obtain benefits. The period of disqualification shall commence the week the determination is issued. The claimant shall also be ineligible for waiting week credit and shall repay any sums received for any week for which the claimant received waiting week credit or benefits as a result of having willfully made a false statement or willfully failed to report a material fact. The claimant shall also be ineligible for waiting week credit or benefits for any week in which he owes the department an overpayment, civil penalty, or interest resulting from a determination that he willfully made a false statement or willfully failed to report a material fact.

(13) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits if his principal occupation is self-employment.

(14) A claimant who has been found ineligible for benefits under the provisions of subsection (5), (6), (7) or (9) of this section shall reestablish his eligibility by having obtained bona fide work and received wages therefor in an amount of at least fourteen (14) times his weekly benefit amount.

(15) Benefits based on service in employment defined in sections 72-1349A and 72-1352(3), Idaho Code, shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this act.

(a) If the services performed during one-half (1/2) or more of any contract period by an individual for an educational institution as defined in section 72-1322B, Idaho Code, are in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity, all the services shall be deemed to be in such capacity.

(b) If the services performed during less than one-half (1/2) of any contract period by an individual for an educational institution are in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity, none of the service shall be deemed to be in such capacity.

(16) No claimant is eligible to receive benefits in two (2) successive benefit years unless, after the beginning of the first benefit year during which he received benefits, he performed service and earned an amount equal to not less than six (6) times the weekly benefit amount established during the first benefit year.
(17)(a) Benefits based on wages earned for services performed in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an educational institution shall not be paid for any week of unemployment commencing during the period between two (2) successive academic years, or during a similar period between two (2) terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual’s contract, to any individual who performs such services in the first academic year (or term) and has a contract to perform services in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second academic year or term, or has been given reasonable assurance that such a contract will be offered.

(b) Benefits based on wages earned for services performed in any other capacity for an educational institution shall not be paid to any individual for any week that commences during a period between two (2) successive school years or terms if the individual performs such services in the first school year or term, and there is a contract or reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such services in the second school year or term. If benefits are denied to any individual under this paragraph and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational institution for the second academic year or term, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this clause [paragraph].

(c) With respect to any services described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, benefits shall not be paid nor “waiting week” credit given to an individual for wages earned for services for any week that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if the individual performed the services in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance the individual will perform such services in the period immediately following such vacation period or holiday recess.

(18) Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services that substantially consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to participate for any week which commences during the period between two (2) successive sport seasons (or similar periods) if the individual performed services in the first season (or similar period) and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such services in the later of such season (or similar period).

(19)(a) Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed by an alien unless the alien was lawfully admitted for permanent residence at the time such services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing such services, or was permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed (including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States as a result of the application of the provisions of sections 207 and 208 or section 212(d)(5) of the immigration and nationality act).

(b) Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine eligibility under this subsection shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits.
(c) A decision to deny benefits under this subsection must be based on a preponderance of the evidence.

(20) An individual who has been determined to be likely to exhaust regular benefits and to need reemployment services pursuant to a profiling system established by the director must participate in those reemployment services unless:

(a) The individual has completed such services; or

(b) There is justifiable cause, as determined by the director, for the claimant’s failure to participate in such services.

(21)(a) A claimant:

will not be considered unemployed upon completion or termination of an assignment until such time as he contacts the staffing service to determine if further suitable work is available. If the claimant:

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “staffing service” means any person who assigns individuals to work for its customers and includes, but is not limited to, professional employers as defined in chapter 24, title 44, Idaho Code, and the employers of temporary employees as defined in section 44-2403(7), Idaho Code.

(22)(a) A claimant who is otherwise eligible for regular benefits as defined in section 72-1367A(1)(e), Idaho Code, shall be eligible for training extension benefits if the department determines that all of the following criteria are met:

(b) The weekly training extension benefit amount shall equal the claimant’s weekly benefit amount for the most recent benefit year less any deductible income as determined by the provisions of this chapter. The total amount of training extension benefits payable to a claimant shall be equal to twenty-six (26) times the claimant’s average weekly benefit amount for the most recent benefit year. A claimant who is receiving training extension benefits shall not be denied training extension benefits due to the application of subsections (4)(a)(i) and (6) of this section and an employer’s account shall not be charged for training extension benefits paid to the claimant.

Section 3 of S.L. 2009, ch. 238 provided that the act should take effect on and after January 1, 2010.
CASE NOTES

Termination as a result of resignation.
Voluntarily leaving.

§ 72-1366A. Personal eligibility conditions

School district employees. [Repealed.]

§ 72-1367. Benefit formula.

To be eligible an individual shall have the minimum qualifying amount of wages in covered employment in at least one (1) calendar quarter of his base period, and shall have total base period wages of at least one and one-quarter (1 1/4) times his high quarter wages. The minimum qualifying amount of wages shall be determined each January 1 and shall equal fifty percent (50%) of the product of the state minimum wage, as defined by section 44-1502, Idaho Code, multiplied by five hundred twenty (520) hours, rounded to the lowest multiple of twenty-six (26).

The weekly benefit amount shall be one twenty-sixth (1/26) of highest quarter wages except that it shall not exceed the applicable maximum weekly benefit amount. The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be established by the director, who shall determine the state average weekly wage paid by covered employers for the preceding calendar year and the maximum weekly benefit amount to be effective for new claims filed in the first full week of the following January and filed thereafter until a new maximum weekly benefit amount becomes effective under this subsection. The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be fifty-five percent (55%) of the state average weekly wage paid by covered employers for the preceding calendar year.

Any eligible individual shall be entitled during any benefit year to a total amount of benefits equal to his weekly benefit amount times the number of full weeks of benefit entitlement appearing in the following table based on his ratio of total base period earnings to highest quarter base period earnings. The maximum weeks of entitlement are based on a sliding scale of the official forecasted, seasonally adjusted unemployment rate for the state for a minimum of ten (10) weeks to a maximum of twenty-six (26) weeks depending on the unemployment rate in effect for the months of February, May, August and November as follows:

For any benefit week commencing in January through March of a calendar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of November;

For any benefit week commencing in April through June of a calendar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of February;

For any benefit week commencing in July through September of a calendar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of May; and

For any benefit week commencing in October through December of a calendar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of August.

25

01

10

00

If the total wages payable to an individual for less than full-time work performed in a week claimed exceed one-half (1/2) of his weekly benefit amount, the amount of wages that exceed one-half (1/2) of the weekly benefit amount shall be deducted from the benefits payable to the claimant. For purposes of this subsection, severance pay shall be deemed wages, even if the claimant was required to sign a release of claims as a condition of receiving the pay from the employer. “Severance pay” means a payment or payments made to a claimant by an employer as a result of the severance of the employment relationship.

Benefits payable to an individual shall be rounded to the next lower full dollar amount.

ot

1.60

10

10

10

10

10

10

10

1.6001

1.80

11

10

10

10

10

10

10

1.8001

1.92

12

11

10

10

10

10

10

1.9201

13

12

11

10

10

10

10

2.0101

2.08

14

13

12

11

10

10

10

2.0801

2.14

15

14

13

12

11

10

10

2.1401

2.21

16

15

14

13

12

11

10

2.2101

2.29

17

16

15

14

13

12

11

2.2901

2.38

18

17

16

15

14

13

12

2.3801

2.49

19

18

17

16

15

14

13

2.4901

2.61

20

19

18

17

16

15

14

2.6101

2.75

21

20

19

18

17

16

15

2.7501

2.91

22

21

20

19

18

17

16

2.9101

23

22

21

20

19

18

17

3.1001

3.32

24

23

22

21

20

19

18

3.3201

3.56

25

24

23

22

21

20

19

3.5601

26

25

24

23

22

21

20